New Jersey, session 221, A5398.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section: Board means the Board of Public Utilities. Electric public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes electricity to end users within the State. Gas public utility means a public utility, as that term is defined in R.S.48:2-13, that distributes gas to end users within the State. b.    Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no electric public utility rate increases for residential customers shall go into effect during the summer season from June 1 through August 31. c.     Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, no gas public utility rate increases for residential customers shall go into effect during the winter season from January 1 through March 31. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.